Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.01
Sickness and
accident insurance; standard policy provisions; requirements; enumeration.

No policy of sickness and accident insurance shall be delivered
or issued for delivery to any person in this state unless (1) the entire money
and other considerations therefor are expressed therein, (2) the time at which
the insurance takes effect and terminates is expressed therein, (3) it purports
to insure only one person, except that a policy may insure, originally or
by subsequent amendment, upon the application of an adult member of a family
who shall be deemed the policyholder, any two or more eligible members of
that family, including husband, wife, dependent children, any children enrolled
on a full-time basis in any college, university, or trade school, or any children
under a specified age which shall not exceed thirty years
and any other person dependent upon the policyholder; any individual policy
hereinafter delivered or issued for delivery in this state which provides
that coverage of a dependent child shall terminate upon the attainment of
the limiting age for dependent children specified in the policy shall also
provide in substance that attainment of such limiting age shall not operate
to terminate the coverage of such child during the continuance of such policy
and while the child is and continues to be both (a) incapable of self-sustaining
employment by reason of mental retardation or physical handicap and (b) chiefly
dependent upon the policyholder for support and maintenance, if proof of such
incapacity and dependency is furnished to the insurer by the policyholder
within thirty-one days of the child's attainment of the limiting age and subsequently
as may be required by the insurer but not more frequently than annually after
the two-year period following the child's attainment of the limiting age;
such insurer may charge an additional premium for and with respect to any
such continuation of coverage beyond the limiting age of the policy with respect
to such child, which premium shall be determined by the insurer on the basis
of the class of risks applicable to such child, (4) it contains a title on
the face of the policy correctly describing the policy, (5) the exceptions
and reductions of indemnity are set forth in the policy and, except those
which are set forth in sections 44-710.03 and 44-710.04, are printed, at the
insurer's option, either included with the benefit provision to which they
apply or under an appropriate caption such as EXCEPTIONS, or EXCEPTIONS AND
REDUCTIONS; if an exception or reduction specifically applies only to a particular
benefit of the policy, a statement of such exception or reduction shall be
included with the benefit provision to which it applies, (6) each such form,
including riders and endorsements, shall be identified by a form number in
the lower left-hand corner of the first page thereof, (7) it contains no provision
purporting to make any portion of the charter, rules, constitution, or bylaws
of the insurer a part of the policy unless such portion is set forth in full
in the policy, except in the case of the incorporation of, or reference to,
a statement of rates or classification of risks, or short-rate table filed
with the Director of Insurance, and (8) on or after January 1, 1999, any restrictive
rider contains a notice of the existence of the Comprehensive Health Insurance
Pool if the policy provides health insurance as defined in section 44-4209.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 2, p. 643;

Laws 1969, c. 374, § 1, p. 1333;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 131;

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB551, § 1.